Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-303.10
Civil action; statute of limitations.

A civil action arising under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act may be brought only within four years from the date of the purchase of goods or services.

Laws 1976, LB 820, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 656, § 24.